Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-2108
Real estate; acquisition; requirement.

An authority shall not acquire real property for a redevelopment project within the corporate limits of a city or a city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction unless the governing body of such city has approved the redevelopment plan, as prescribed in section 18-2116 or 18-2155.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 6(1), p. 804;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1608;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2608;

Laws 2020, LB1021, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 78.
July 18, 2026